apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="compo/ndre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ndríem</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndria</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndríeu</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndries</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndrien</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndria</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndrem</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndré</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndreu</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndràs</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndran</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndrà</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>nguéssim</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ngués</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>nguéssiu</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>nguessis</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>nguessin</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ngués</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nent</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nent</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>nguérem</l>   <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>nguí</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>nguéreu</l>   <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ngueres</l>   <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ngueren</l>   <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ngué</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nguem</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nguem</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>neu</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>neu</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>nguin</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nguen</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>nguin</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nguen</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ngui</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nga</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ngui</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nga</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndre</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ndre</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>níem</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nia</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>níeu</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nies</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nien</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nia</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>nguéssim</l> <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nguérem</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ngués</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nguera</l>   <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>nguéssiu</l> <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nguéreu</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>nguessis</l> <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ngueres</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>nguessin</l> <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ngueren</l>  <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ngués</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nguera</l>   <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>stes</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sta</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>sts</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


  <e v="val"><p><l>stos</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nem</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nc</l>        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>neu</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>nguem</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ngui</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>nga</l>      <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ngueu</l>     <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>nguis</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ngues</l>    <r>ndre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="compondre">       <i>compo</i><par n="compo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="correspondre">    <i>correspo</i><par n="compo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="descompondre">    <i>descompo</i><par n="compo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pondre">          <i>po</i><par n="compo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recompondre" a="prompsit2adn"><i>recompo</i><par n="compo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="respondre">       <i>respo</i><par n="compo/ndre__vblex"/></e>
